Utah statutes.
32A-1-604.   Compliance -- Disciplinary proceeding.
(1)  Each person granted a license or permit by the commission to sell, serve,
or allow consumption of alcoholic beverages on a premises or at an event and
each officer, employee, or agent of the licensee or permittee shall comply
with the conditions and requirements of this part.
(2)  Failure to comply with this part may result in a disciplinary proceeding
pursuant to Section 32A-1-119 against:
(a)  a licensee or permittee; and
(b)  an officer, employee, or agent of the licensee or permittee.
